Hawaii statutes.
[§128B-1] Cybersecurity, economic,
education, and infrastructure security coordinator; powers and duties. (a)
There is established the full-time Hawaii cybersecurity, economic, education,
and infrastructure security coordinator to oversee cybersecurity and cyber
resiliency matters, including cybersecurity, economic, education, and
infrastructure security for the State. The coordinator shall be placed within
the state department of defense.

(b) The coordinator shall be selected by the
state adjutant general based on the recommendations of the various agencies,
departments, and private entities that will partner with the coordinator.

(c) The coordinator shall partner with
representatives from the following entities:

(1) The Hawaii fusion center;

(2) The Hawaii state cyber resiliency center;

(3) Federal government agencies;

(4) State government agencies;

(5) The counties of the State;

(6) Institutions of higher education; and

(7) Other entities within the power, water,
communications, transportation, and finance sectors, including public
utilities, private telecommunications companies, airlines, financial
institutions, and private information technology companies.

(d) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
the coordinator, through its various partnerships, shall develop the
requirements and methods for:

(1) Improving cyber resiliency within the State
through the development of a structure that shall include education,
cybersecurity, and critical infrastructure protection;

(2) Improving the State's critical infrastructure
network and resiliency, including identifying interdependencies of critical
infrastructures, points of connection between critical infrastructures, the
most critical nodes, and the cascading effects of a cyber-attack on these points
of connection between critical infrastructure;

(3) Improving the State's cybersecurity by using
existing resources within the State;

(4) Examining specific requirements and actions to
accelerate the growth of the cybersecurity industry in the State;

(5) Defining the requirements and opportunities to
secure state, federal, and private moneys for cybersecurity activities and
related educational programs;

(6) Forming partnerships to implement cyber
resiliency structures and protocol to identify and share information about
possible cyber-attacks and mitigate damage and recover quickly and efficiently
from cyber-attacks; and

(7) Expanding the State's cybersecurity and cyber
resiliency understanding and workforce through education.

(e) The coordinator may request the assistance
of other departments, agencies, and private companies, both inside and outside
of the State to carry out its duties.

(f) For the purposes of this section:

"Coordinator" shall mean the Hawaii
cybersecurity, economic, education, and infrastructure security coordinator.

"Cyber resiliency" shall mean the
ability to complete vulnerability assessments, identify potential
cyber-attacks, mitigate losses from cyber-attacks, and recover quickly and
efficiently from cyber-attacks. [L 2014, c 129, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next